Hawaii statutes.
§368-1.5 Programs and activities receiving
state financial assistance. (a) No otherwise qualified individual in the
State shall, solely by reason of his or her disability, be excluded from the
participation in, be denied the benefits of, or be subjected to discrimination
by state agencies, or under any program or activity receiving state financial
assistance.

(b) As used in this section, the term
"disability" means the state of having a physical or mental
impairment which substantially limits one or more major life activities, having
a record of such an impairment, or being regarded as having such an impairment.

(c) As used in this section, "state
financial assistance" means grants, purchase-of-service contracts, or any
other arrangement by which the State provides or otherwise makes available
assistance in the form of funds to an entity for the purpose of rendering
services on behalf of the State. It does not include procurement contracts,
state insurance or guaranty contracts, licenses, tax credits, or loan
guarantees to private businesses of general concern that do not render services
on behalf of the State. [L 1989, c 387, §2; am L 1992, c 33, §5]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next